District of Columbia statutes.
38-155

Adoption and use of seal.

The Mayor is hereby authorized to adopt, alter and use a seal which shall be judicially noticed, and to prescribe rules and regulations as may be deemed necessary to implement this section.

Aug. 2, 1978, D.C. Law 2-96, § 2, 25 DCR 1272
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 1006, 54 DCR 4102
1981 Ed., § 31-119.
1973 Ed., § 31-122.
D.C. Law 17-9 substituted “The Mayor” for “The Board of Education of the District of Columbia”.